Mississippi, session 2026, HB1082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 67-1-81, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 67-1-81.  (1)  (a)  Any permittee or other person who shall sell, furnish, dispose of, give, or cause to be sold, furnished, disposed of, or given, any alcoholic beverage to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for a first offense.  For a second or subsequent offense, such permittee or other person shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court. (b)  (i)  If a permittee, or any employee of a permittee, violates paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), then, in addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the commissioner may impose the following penalties against the  permittee on whose premises the alcoholic beverages were sold, given or furnished: 1.  For the first offense on the licensed premises, suspension of the permit for not more than one (1) week. 2.  For a second offense occurring on the licensed premises within a twelve-month period, suspension of the permit for not more than two (2) weeks. 3.  For a third offense occurring on the licensed premises within a twelve-month period, suspension of the permit for not more than three (3) weeks or revocation of the permit. 4.  For a fourth or subsequent offense occurring on the licensed premises within a twelve-month period, revocation of the permit. After a third or subsequent offense, the commissioner also may require that the permittee have and use an independent, third-party age-verification app on the licensed premises for the purpose of determining whether a person to whom alcoholic beverages are sold, furnished, given or caused to be sold on the licensed premises is twenty-one (21) years of age or older.  The app used must have at least an eighty-five percent (85%) accuracy rating according to national standards.  The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations for determining the length of time a permittee shall be required to use the app. A violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be sufficient to impose the administrative penalties and any other requirement authorized under this paragraph (b), and any expunction of conviction shall have no effect on any administrative penalty or other requirement imposed against a permittee under this paragraph (b). (2)  Any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years who purchases, receives, or has in his or her possession in any public place, any alcoholic beverages, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).  Provided, that clearing or busing tables that have glasses or other containers that contain or did contain alcoholic beverages, or stocking, bagging or otherwise handling purchases of alcoholic beverages shall not be deemed possession of alcoholic beverages for the purposes of this section.  Provided further, that a person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but under the age of twenty-one (21) years who waits on tables by taking orders for or delivering orders of alcoholic beverages shall not be deemed to unlawfully possess or furnish alcoholic beverages if in the scope of his employment by the holder of an on-premises retailer's permit.  This exception shall not authorize a person under the age of twenty-one (21) to tend bar or act in the capacity of bartender.  Any person under the age of twenty-one (21) who knowingly makes a false statement to the effect that he or she is twenty-one (21) years old or older or presents any document that indicates he or she is twenty-one (21) years of age or older for the purpose of purchasing alcoholic beverages from any person engaged in the sale of alcoholic beverages shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and a sentence to not more than thirty (30) days' community service. (3)  The term "community service" as used in this section shall mean work, projects or services for the benefit of the community assigned, supervised and recorded by appropriate public officials. (4)  If a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years is convicted or enters a plea of guilty of purchasing, receiving or having in his or her possession in any public place any alcoholic beverages in violation of subsection (2) of this section, the trial judge, in lieu of the penalties otherwise provided under subsection (2) of this section, shall suspend the minor's driver's license by taking and keeping it in the custody of the court for a period of time not to exceed ninety (90) days.  The judge so ordering the suspension shall enter upon his docket "DEFENDANT'S DRIVER'S LICENSE SUSPENDED FOR ____ DAYS IN LIEU OF CONVICTION" and such action by the trial judge shall not constitute a conviction.  During the period that the minor's driver's license is suspended, the trial judge shall suspend the imposition of any fines or penalties that may be imposed under subsection (2) of this section and may place the minor on probation subject to such conditions as the judge deems appropriate.  If the minor violates any of the conditions of probation, then the trial judge shall return the driver's license to the minor and impose the fines, penalties or both, that he would have otherwise imposed, and such action shall constitute a conviction. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.